Hawaii statutes.
§490:3-114 Contradictory terms of
instrument. If an instrument contains contradictory terms, typewritten
terms prevail over printed terms, handwritten terms prevail over both, and
words prevail over numbers. [L 1991, c 118, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next